Vermont, session 2025-2026, H791.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 206 is added to read:
CHAPTER 206. GOVERNMENT DATA PRACTICES
§ 4631. SHORT TITLE AND DEFINITIONS
(a) This chapter may be cited as the “Vermont Government Data Practices
Act.”
(b) As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agency” means any agency, department, board, commission, or any
other entity or officer of the Executive Branch of State government.
(2) “Commercial purpose” means any purpose that has financial gain as
a major objective. It does not include the gathering or dissemination of
newsworthy facts by a publisher or broadcaster.
(3) “Disclose” means to disclose, release, transfer, disseminate, or
otherwise communicate all or any part of any record orally, in writing, or by
electronic or any other means to any person or entity.
(4) “Maintain” means to maintain, store, acquire, use, or disclose.
(5) “Neural data” means information that is generated by measuring the
activity of an individual’s central or peripheral nervous system and that is not
inferred from nonneural information.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 3 of 26
(6)(A) “Personal information” or “information” means any information
that identifies, relates to, describes, or is capable of being associated with a
particular individual, including the following:
(i) name, alias, address, unique personal identifier, online
identifier, IP address, email address, account name, Social Security number,
driver’s license number, passport number, or other personal identifier;
(ii) vehicle registration information, including license plate
numbers;
(iii) the contents of an individual’s mail, email, and text messages,
unless the agency is the intended recipient of the communication;
(iv) characteristics of protected classifications;
(v) racial or ethnic origin, citizenship or immigration status,
religious beliefs, political positions or affiliations, or union membership;
(vi) biometric information;
(vii) genetic data;
(viii) precise geolocation data;
(ix) audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar
information;
(x) insurance policy numbers;
(xi) neural data;
(xii) information concerning an individual’s health; and
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 4 of 26
(xiii) information concerning an individual’s gender, sex life, or
sexual orientation.
(B) “Personal information” may exist in various formats, including
the following:
(i) physical formats, including paper documents, printed images,
vinyl records, or video tapes;
(ii) digital formats, including text, image, audio, or video files;
and
(iii) abstract digital formats, including compressed or encrypted
files, metadata, or artificial intelligence systems that are capable of outputting
personal information.
(7) “Precise geolocation data” means any data that is derived from a
device and that is used or intended to be used to locate an individual within a
geographic area that is equal to or less than the area of a circle with a radius of
1,850 feet.
(8) “Record” means any file or grouping of personal information that is
maintained by an agency.
§ 4632. COLLECTION AND STORAGE
(a) Maintaining records.
(1) An agency shall maintain in its records only the personal information
that is:
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 5 of 26
(A) relevant and necessary to accomplish a legitimate purpose of the
agency;
(B) required or authorized by the State; or
(C) required under federal law.
(2) Before a record is used by an agency to make a determination about
an individual, the agency shall maintain the record, to the maximum extent
possible, with accuracy, relevance, timeliness, and completeness.
(3) Before an agency transfers a record outside State government, it
shall correct, update, withhold, or delete any portion of the record that it knows
or has reason to believe is inaccurate or untimely.
(4) An agency that provides by contract for the operation or
maintenance of records to accomplish an agency function shall require that the
provisions of this chapter be applied to those records. For purposes of section
4637 of this chapter, any contractor and any employee of the contractor, if the
contract is agreed to on or after July 1, 2026, shall be considered an employee
of an agency.
(b) Collection and sources of information.
(1) An agency shall collect the personal information of an individual to
the greatest extent practicable directly from the individual who is the subject of
the personal information rather than from another source.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 6 of 26
(2) When an agency collects the personal information of an individual,
the agency shall maintain the source or sources of the personal information,
unless the source is the individual or the individual has received a copy of the
source document, including the name of a source who is an individual acting in
the individual’s own private or individual capacity. If the source is an agency,
branch of the federal government, or other organization, such as a corporation
or association, this requirement can be met by maintaining the name of the
agency, branch of the federal government, or organization, provided the
smallest reasonably identifiable unit of that agency, branch of the federal
government, or organization is named.
(3) When an agency electronically collects the personal information of
an individual, the agency shall maintain the source or sources of the personal
information or any intermediate form of the personal information as set forth in
subdivision (2) of this subsection, unless:
(A) the source is the individual and the individual has requested that
the information be discarded; or
(B) the individual has received a copy of the source document.
(4) An agency shall maintain the source or sources of the personal
information in a readily accessible format so as to be able to provide it to the
individual when the individual inspects a record pursuant to subsection
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 7 of 26
4634(d) of this chapter. This subdivision shall not apply if the source or
sources are exempt from disclosure under the provisions of this chapter.
(c) Notice required.
(1) An agency shall provide on or with any form used to collect personal
information from an individual the following notice:
(A) the name of the agency and the department or office within the
agency that is requesting the information;
(B) the title, business address, and telephone number of the agency
official who is responsible for the records;
(C) the authority, whether granted by statute, administrative rule, or
executive order, that authorizes the maintenance of the information;
(D) with respect to each item of information, whether the submission
of such information is mandatory or voluntary;
(E) the consequences, if any, of not providing all or any part of the
requested information;
(F) the purpose or purposes within the agency for which the
information is to be used;
(G) any known or foreseeable disclosures that may be made of the
information pursuant to subdivision 4633(a)(6) or (7) of this chapter; and
(H) the individual’s right of access to records containing the
individual’s personal information that are maintained by the agency.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 8 of 26
(2) The notice required by subdivision (1) of this subsection does not
apply to:
(A) agency requirements for an individual to provide the individual’s
name, identifying number, photograph, address, or similar identifying
information, if this information is used only for the purpose of identification
and communication with the individual by the agency, except that
requirements for an individual’s Social Security number shall conform with the
provisions of the federal Privacy Act of 1974, as may be amended;
(B) any enforcement document issued by an employee of a law
enforcement agency in the performance of the employee’s duties wherein the
violator is provided an exact copy of the document; or
(C) accident reports whereby the parties of interest may obtain a copy
of the report.
(3) An agency official pursuant to subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection
shall, upon request, inform an individual regarding the location of the
individual’s records and the categories of any persons that use the information
in those records.
(d) Compliance and rules of conduct.
(1) An agency shall designate an agency employee to be responsible for
ensuring that the agency complies with all provisions of this chapter.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 9 of 26
(2) An agency shall, in consultation with the Agency of Administration,
establish:
(A) rules of conduct for persons involved in the design, development,
operation, disclosure, or maintenance of records and instruct each person with
respect to the requirements of this chapter, including any rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter and the penalties for noncompliance; and
(B) appropriate and reasonable administrative, technical, and
physical safeguards to:
(i) ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter;
(ii) ensure the security and confidentiality of records; and
(iii) protect against anticipated threats or hazards to a record’s
security or integrity that could result in an injury.
(e) Use of records. An agency shall not use records for any purpose other
than the purpose for which the personal information was collected, except as
otherwise required by State law.
§ 4633. DISCLOSING RECORDS
(a) Limited disclosure. An agency shall not disclose any personal
information in a manner that would link the information disclosed to the
individual to whom it pertains unless the information is disclosed accordingly:
(1) To the individual to whom the information pertains.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 10 of 26
(2) With the prior written, voluntary consent of the individual to whom
the information pertains, but only if that consent has been obtained not more
than 30 days before the disclosure, or in the time limit agreed to by the
individual in the written consent.
(3) To the duly appointed guardian or conservator of the individual to
whom the information pertains.
(4) To a person representing the individual to whom the information
pertains if it can be proven with reasonable certainty through the possession of
agency forms, documents, or correspondence that this person is the authorized
representative of the individual.
(5) To those officers, employees, attorneys, agents, or volunteers of the
agency that have custody of the information, if the disclosure is relevant and
necessary in the ordinary course of the performance of their official duties and
furthers the purpose for which the information was acquired.
(6) To another agency if the transfer is necessary for the transferee
agency to perform its constitutional or statutory duties, and the use furthers the
purpose for which the information was collected, and the use or transfer is in
accordance with subdivision (b)(1) or (b)(2) of this section. With respect to
information transferred from a law enforcement or regulatory agency, or
information transferred to another law enforcement or regulatory agency, a use
is compatible if the use of the information requested is needed in an
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 11 of 26
investigation of unlawful activity under the jurisdiction of the requesting
agency or for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes by that agency.
(7) To a branch of the federal government if authorized by State law.
(8) Pursuant to the Vermont Public Records Act.
(9) To a person who has provided the agency with advance, adequate
written assurance that the information will be used solely for statistical
research or reporting purposes, but only if the information to be disclosed is in
a form that cannot identify any individual, and the written assurance includes a
statement that the person will not attempt to reidentify the information.
(10) Pursuant to a determination by the agency that maintains personal
information that compelling circumstances exist that affect the health or safety
of an individual, if upon the disclosure a notification is transmitted to the
individual to whom the information pertains at the individual’s last known
address. Disclosure shall not be made if it is in conflict with other State or
federal laws.
(11) To the State Archives as a record that has sufficient historical or
other value to warrant its continued preservation by the State, or for evaluation
by the Secretary of Administration to determine whether the record has further
administrative, legal, or fiscal value.
(12) To any person pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other
compulsory legal process if, before the disclosure, the agency reasonably
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 12 of 26
attempts to notify the individual to whom the record pertains, and if the
notification is otherwise not prohibited by law.
(13) To another person or governmental organization to the extent
necessary to obtain information from the person or governmental organization
for an investigation by the agency of a failure to comply with a specific State
law that the agency is responsible for enforcing.
(14) To an adopted person with disclosure being limited to general
background information pertaining to the adopted person’s biological parents,
if the information does not include or reveal the identity of the biological
parents.
(15) To a child or a grandchild of an adopted person and disclosure is
limited to medically necessary information pertaining to the adopted person’s
biological parents. However, the information, or the process for obtaining the
information, shall not include or reveal the identity of the biological parents.
The Department for Children and Families shall adopt rules governing the
release of information pursuant to this subdivision. The rules shall require
licensed adoption agencies to provide the same services provided by the
Department as established by this subdivision.
(16) To a member of the General Assembly, if the member has
permission to obtain the information from the individual to whom it pertains or
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 13 of 26
if the member provides reasonable assurance that the member is acting on
behalf of the individual.
(b) Accounting of disclosures.
(1) An agency shall keep an accurate accounting of the date, nature, and
purpose of each disclosure of a record made pursuant to subdivision (a)(10) or
(a)(12) of this section. This accounting shall also be required for disclosures
made pursuant to subdivision (a)(6) or (a)(7) of this section unless notice of the
type of disclosure has been provided pursuant to subsection 4632(c) of this
chapter. The accounting shall also include the name, title, and business
address of the person or agency to whom the disclosure was made.
(2) Routine disclosures of information pertaining to crimes, offenders,
and suspected offenders to law enforcement or regulatory agencies of federal,
State, and local government shall be deemed to be disclosures pursuant to
subdivision (a)(6) of this section for the purpose of meeting the requirement set
forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) With respect to the sale of information concerning the registration of
any vehicle or the sale of information from the files of drivers’ licenses, the
Department of Motor Vehicles shall establish procedures under which any
person making a request for information shall be required to identify
themselves and state the reason for making the request. These procedures shall
provide for the verification of the name and address of the person making a
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 14 of 26
request for the information and that the Department may require the person to
produce the information as it determines is necessary in order to ensure that the
name and address of the person are the person’s true name and address.
(4) An agency shall retain the accounting made pursuant to this
subsection for at least three years after the disclosure for which the accounting
is made. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require retention of
the original documents for a three-year period, providing that the agency can
otherwise comply with the requirements of this subsection.
(5) Beginning on July 1, 2026, an agency shall inform any person or
agency to whom a record containing personal information has been disclosed
during the preceding three years of any correction of an error or notation of
dispute made pursuant to subdivision 4634(e)(1) or (2) of this chapter if:
(A) an accounting of the disclosure is required by this subsection (b)
and the accounting has not been destroyed in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter;
(B) the information provides the name of the person or agency to
whom the disclosure was made; or
(C) the person who is the subject of the disclosed record provides the
name of the person or agency to whom the information was disclosed.
(6) Any agency that owns or licenses computerized data that includes
personal information shall disclose any breach of the security of the system
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 15 of 26
following discovery or notification of the breach in the security of the data
pursuant to the Security Breach Notice Act, 9 V.S.A. chapter 62, subchapter 2.
(c) Commercial sale prohibition. An agency shall not sell, rent, or
otherwise distribute for commercial purposes an individual’s name and address
unless the distribution is specifically authorized by State law.
§ 4634. ACCESS TO AND INSPECTION OF RECORDS
(a) Publishing guidelines. An agency shall publish guidelines specifying
procedures to be followed in order fully to implement each of the rights of
individuals set forth in this section.
(b) Right to access records.
(1) Each individual shall have the right to inquire and be notified as to
whether an agency maintains a record about the individual. An agency shall
take reasonable steps to assist an individual in making the individual’s request
sufficiently specific.
(2) Any notice sent to an individual pursuant to this subsection that
indicates that the agency maintains any record concerning that individual shall
include the title and business address of the agency official responsible for
maintaining the agency’s records, the procedures to be followed to gain access
to the records, and the procedures to be followed for the individual to contest
the contents of these records.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 16 of 26
(3) In implementing the right conferred by this section, an agency may
specify in its guidelines reasonable times, places, and requirements for:
(A) identifying the individual who requests access to a record; and
(B) disclosing the contents of a record.
(4) An agency may establish fees to be charged, if any, to an individual
for making copies of a record. Such fees shall exclude the cost of any search
for and review of the record, and shall not exceed $0.10 per page, unless the
agency fee for copying is established by statute.
(5) This section applies to the rights of an individual to whom the
personal information pertains and not to the authority or right of any other
person, agency, agency of another state, or branch of the federal government to
obtain this information.
(c) Exempt from access. This chapter shall not be construed to require an
agency to disclose personal information to an individual to whom the
information pertains, if the information:
(1) is compiled for the purpose of identifying individual criminal
offenders and alleged offenders and consists only of identifying data and
notations of arrests, the nature and disposition of criminal charges, sentencing,
confinement, release, and parole and probation status;
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 17 of 26
(2) is compiled for the purpose of a criminal investigation of suspected
criminal activities, including reports of informants and investigators, and
associated with an identifiable individual;
(3) is contained in any record that could identify an individual and that
is compiled at any stage of the process of the enforcement of criminal laws,
from the arrest or indictment stage through release from supervision and
including the process of extradition or the exercise of executive clemency;
(4) is maintained for the purpose of an investigation of an individual’s
fitness for licensure or public employment, or of a grievance or complaint, or a
suspected civil offense, provided the information is withheld only so as not to
compromise the investigation, or a related investigation;
(5) would compromise the objectivity or fairness of a competitive
examination for appointment to or promotion in public service, or to determine
fitness for licensure, or to determine scholastic aptitude;
(6) pertains to the physical or psychological condition of the individual,
if the agency determines that disclosure would be detrimental to the individual;
or
(7) is otherwise required by law to be withheld from the individual to
whom it pertains.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 18 of 26
(d) Inspection and presentation of records.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an agency shall permit
any individual upon request and proper identification to inspect all the personal
information in any record containing personal information and maintained by
reference to an identifying particular assigned to the individual not later than
30 days after the agency’s receipt of the request for active records, and not
later than 60 days after the agency’s receipt of the request for records that are
geographically dispersed or that are inactive and in central storage. Failure to
respond within these time limits shall be deemed denial. In addition, the
individual shall be permitted to inspect any personal information about the
individual where it is maintained by reference to an identifying particular other
than that of the individual, if the agency knows or should know that the
information exists. The individual also shall be permitted to inspect the
accounting made pursuant to subsection 4633(b) of this chapter.
(2) An agency shall permit the individual, and, upon the individual’s
request, another person of the individual’s own choosing, to inspect all the
personal information in the individual’s record and have an exact copy made of
all or any portion thereof not later than 15 days after the inspection.
(3) The agency shall present the information in the record in a form
reasonably comprehensible to the general public.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 19 of 26
(4) Whenever an agency is unable to access a record by reference to
name only, or when access by name only would impose an unreasonable
administrative burden, the agency may require the individual to submit such
other identifying information as will facilitate access to the record.
(5) When an individual is entitled under this chapter to gain access to
the information in a record containing personal information, the information or
a true copy thereof shall be made available to the individual at a location near
the residence of the individual or by mail, whenever reasonable.
(e) Amending records.
(1) An agency shall permit an individual to request in writing an
amendment of the individual’s record and shall, not later than 30 days after
receipt of such request:
(A) make each correction in accordance with the individual’s request
of any portion of a record that the individual believes is not accurate, relevant,
timely, or complete and inform the individual of the corrections made in
accordance with the individual’s request; or
(B) inform the individual of the agency’s refusal to amend the record
in accordance with the individual’s request, the reason for the refusal, the
procedures established by the agency for the individual to request a review by
the head of the agency or an official specifically designated by the head of the
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 20 of 26
agency of the refusal to amend, and the name, title, and business address of the
reviewing official.
(2)(A) An agency shall permit any individual who disagrees with the
refusal of the agency to amend a record to request a review of such refusal by
the head of the agency or an official specifically designated by the head of
such agency, and, not later than 30 days after the date on which the individual
requests such review, complete such review and make a final determination.
If, after such review, the reviewing official refuses to amend the record in
accordance with the request, the agency shall permit the individual to file with
the agency a statement of reasonable length setting forth the reasons for the
individual’s disagreement.
(B) The agency, with respect to any disclosure containing
information about which the individual has filed a statement of disagreement
pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2), shall clearly note any
portion of the record that is disputed and make available copies of such
individual’s statement and copies of a concise statement of the reasons of the
agency for not making the amendment to any person or agency to whom the
disputed record has been or is disclosed.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 21 of 26
(f) Notice and appeal of exemption.
(1) If the agency determines that information requested pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section is exempt from access, it shall inform the
individual in writing of the agency’s finding that access is not required by law.
(2) If an individual directly affected by a determination that information
is exempted from access pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection makes
an appeal to the agency to review its decision, the agency shall conduct a
review of its determination that the particular information is exempt from
access. The review shall be:
(A) completed not later than 30 days after receipt of a request from
the individual;
(B) conducted by the head of the agency or an official specifically
designated by the head of the agency; and
(C) sent to the individual in writing upon its completion.
(g) Privacy of other individuals.
(1) In disclosing information contained in a record to an individual, an
agency shall not disclose any personal information relating to another
individual that may be contained in the record. To comply with this
subdivision, an agency shall, in disclosing the information, delete or redact
from disclosure such information as may be necessary.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 22 of 26
(2) In disclosing information contained in a record to an individual, an
agency need not disclose any information pertaining to that individual that is
exempt pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. To comply with this
subdivision, an agency may, in disclosing personal information contained in a
record, delete or redact from the disclosure any exempt information.
(h) Destruction of personal information.
(1) An agency shall ensure that no record containing personal
information shall be modified, transferred, or destroyed to avoid compliance
with any of the provisions of this chapter. In the event that an agency fails to
comply with the provisions of this subdivision, an individual may bring a civil
action and seek the appropriate remedies and damages pursuant to subsection
4636(b) of this chapter.
(2) An agency shall not remove or destroy personal information about
an individual who has requested access to the information before allowing the
individual access to the record containing the information.
(i) Mailing list removal. Upon written request of an individual, an agency
shall remove the individual’s name and address from a mailing list unless the
listing of the name is exclusively used by the agency to directly contact the
individual.
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 23 of 26
§ 4635. RULEMAKING
The Agency of Administration shall adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this chapter and to provide guidance to other State agencies and departments
on the procedures for disclosure of, access to, and safekeeping of personal
information.
§ 4636. REMEDIES
(a) Refusal to a lawful request to inspect.
(1) An individual may bring a civil action against an agency whenever
an agency refuses to comply with an individual’s lawful request to inspect
pursuant to subdivision 4634(d)(1) of this chapter.
(2) In any suit brought by an individual pursuant to subdivision (1) of
this subsection, the court:
(A) may enjoin the agency from withholding the records and order
the production to the individual of any agency records improperly withheld
from the complainant; and
(B) shall assess against the agency reasonable attorney’s fees and
other litigation costs reasonably incurred in any suit pursuant to this subsection
(a) in which the complainant has prevailed.
(b) Failure to properly maintain records.
(1) An individual may bring a civil action against an agency whenever
the agency fails to:
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 24 of 26
(A) maintain a record concerning the individual with such accuracy,
relevancy, timeliness, and completeness as is necessary to ensure fairness in
any determination relating to the qualifications, character, rights, or
opportunities of, or benefits to the individual that may be made on the basis of
such record, if, as a proximate result of such failure, a determination is made
that is adverse to the individual; or
(B) comply with any other provision of this chapter, or any rule
adopted pursuant to this chapter, in such a way as to have an adverse effect on
the individual.
(2) In any suit brought pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
agency shall be liable to the individual in an amount equal to the sum of:
(A) actual damages sustained by the individual, but that shall not
exceed the amounts specified in 12 V.S.A. § 5601(b); and
(B) the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney’s fees as
determined by the court.
§ 4637. PENALTIES
(a) The intentional violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rules
adopted under this chapter, by an officer or employee of any agency shall
constitute a cause for discipline, including termination of employment.
(b) A person who willfully requests or obtains a record containing personal
information from an agency under false pretenses shall be guilty of a
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 25 of 26
misdemeanor and fined not more than $5,000.00 per violation or imprisoned
not more than one year, or both.
(c) Except for disclosures that are otherwise required or permitted by law,
the intentional disclosure of medical, psychiatric, or psychological information
in violation of the disclosure provisions of this chapter is punishable as a
misdemeanor if the wrongful disclosure results in economic loss or personal
injury to the individual to whom the information pertains.
§ 4638. CONSTRUCTION WITH OTHER LAWS
(a) This chapter shall be construed to supersede any other provision of
State law, including those that authorize an agency to withhold from an
individual a record containing personal information that is otherwise accessible
under the provisions of this chapter.
(b) This chapter shall not be deemed to abridge or limit the rights of
litigants, including parties to administrative proceedings, under the laws, or
case law, of discovery of this State.
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of
any record containing personal information, other than to the subject of such
record, in violation of any other law.
(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to revoke, modify, or alter in
any manner any statutory provision or any judicial decision that authorizes an
VT LEG #385240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.791
2026 Page 26 of 26
individual to gain access to any law enforcement record, or authorizes
discovery in criminal or civil litigation.
Sec. 2. RULEMAKING
The Agency of Administration shall adopt rules pursuant to 20 V.S.A.
§ 4635 on or before March 1, 2027. The Agency shall have the support of the
Agency of Digital Services and the State Archivist in developing the rules that
further the intent of this act.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027, except that this section (effective
dates) and in Sec. 1 (20 V.S.A. § 4635; rulemaking) shall take effect on
passage.
VT LEG #385240 v.1